Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.07.380

Sale of assets.

The authority is authorized to offer for sale from time to time loan portfolios or other assets accumulated by the authority. Sales shall be conducted in a competitive manner and shall be approved by the authority board.

[ 2007 c 36 s 12.]

NOTES:

Policy—Purpose—2007 c 36: See note following RCW 28B.07.300.